Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.170

Corporation name and seal.

The name of a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be established by its metropolitan council. Each metropolitan municipal corporation shall adopt a corporate seal containing the name of the corporation and the date of its formation.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.170. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 17.]